Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2020.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 42 of the General Laws entitled "STATE AFFAIRS AND
GOVERNMENT" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 28.11
RHODE ISLAND FIRE SERVICES TRAINING FUND ACT
42-28.11-1. Title and purpose.
This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Rhode Island Fire Services Training Fund
Act.” The purpose of this chapter is to create a stable, dedicated funding source for statewide fire
service training by establishing a twenty-five hundredths percent (0.25%) assessment on property
and casualty insurance premiums.
42-28.11-2. Rhode Island fire services training fund establishment.
A restricted, non-lapsing Rhode Island fire services training fund within the department of
public safety is hereby created to support the Rhode Island fire academy and statewide fire service
training.
42-28.11-3. Assessment on insurers.
(a) On January 1, 2028 and every January 1 thereafter every insurance company authorized
to write property and casualty insurance in Rhode Island, for every property and casualty insurance
policy issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2027, shall remit an annual assessment equal to
twenty-five hundredths percent (0.25%) of all premiums collected the prior calendar year on:

(1) Homeowners insurance;
(2) Dwelling fire policies;
(3) Commercial property insurance;
(4) Commercial multi-peril insurance policies;
(5) Inland marine insurance policies; and
(6) Other property and casualty insurance lines as defined by the department of business
regulation.
(b) The assessment shall be in addition to all other fees or taxes and shall not be passed
onto policyholders as a specific line-item surcharge.
(c) Payments shall be due on January 1 annually.
(d) All assessments and interest shall be deposited into the Rhode Island fire services
training fund. Interest on any late payment shall be calculated pursuant to the provisions of § 9-21-
10.
(e) The state fire marshal shall administer the fund and disburse fund proceeds as
authorized by the general assembly. Unexpended balances shall not revert to the general fund, but
shall remain in the Rhode Island fire services training fund.
42-28.11-4. Authorized use of funds.
As authorized by the general assembly the funds may be used for:
(1) Rhode Island Fire Academy operations;
(2) Recruit training;
(3) Certification programs;
(4) Hazardous materials, technical rescue, marine, and EMS training;
(5) Capital improvements and live-burn facilities;
(6) Mobile training units;
(7) Curriculum and instructor development; and
(8) Municipal training grants.
42-28.11-5. Reporting.
An annual report shall be submitted by January 31 of each year, beginning in 2028, to the
governor and general assembly detailing revenues, expenditures, training delivered, and municipal
participation.
42-28.11-6. Severability.
If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstances is held
invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter which can be
given effect without the invalid provisions or application, and to this end the provisions of this
LC003186 - Page 2 of 4

chapter are declared to be severable.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003186
========
LC003186 - Page 3 of 4